src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON SPØRRE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:spørre    # ;
          +V+Imp:spør      # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:spør      # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:spørres   # ;
 +v+Ind+Prs+Pass:spørs     # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:spurte    # ;
   +V+Ind+Prt+Pass:spurtes # ;
+V+Ind+PrfPrc+Pass:spurtes # ;
       +V+PrfPrc:spurt     # ;
       +V+PrsPrc:spørrende # ;
LEXICON STELE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:stele    # ;
          +V+Imp:stel     # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:steler   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:steles   # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:stal     # ;
       +V+PrfPrc:stelt    # ;
       +V+PrsPrc:stelende # ;
LEXICON STIGE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
            +V+Inf:stige    # ;
            +V+Imp:stig     # ;
        +V+Ind+Prs:stiger   # ;
   +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:stiges   # ;
        +V+Ind+Prt:steig    # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:steg     # ;
         +V+PrfPrc:steget   # ;
         +V+PrsPrc:stigende # ;
LEXICON STIKKE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:stikke    # ;
          +V+Imp:stikk     # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:stikker   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:stikkes   # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:stakk     # ;
       +V+PrfPrc:stukket   # ;
       +V+PrsPrc:stikkende # ;
LEXICON STJELE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:stjele    # ;
          +V+Imp:stjel     # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:stjeler   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:stjeles   # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:stjal     # ;
       +V+PrfPrc:stjålet   # ;
       +V+PrsPrc:stjelende # ;
LEXICON STREKKE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
           +V+Inf:strekke    # ;
           +V+Imp:strekk     # ;
       +V+Ind+Prs:strekker   # ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:strekkes   # ;
       +V+Ind+Prt:strakk     # ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:strakte    # ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:strekte    # ;
        +V+PrfPrc:strukket   # ;
 +V+PrfPrc+Use/NG:strakt     # ;
 +V+PrfPrc+Use/NG:strekt     # ;
        +V+PrsPrc:strekkende # ;
LEXICON STRIDE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
            +V+Inf:stride    # ;
            +V+Imp:strid     # ;
        +V+Ind+Prs:strider   # ;
   +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:strides   # ;
        +V+Ind+Prt:stridde   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:stred     # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:strei     # ;
         +V+PrfPrc:stridd    # ;
+V+PrfPrc+Err/Orth:stritt    # ;
         +V+PrsPrc:stridende # ;
LEXICON STRYKE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
              +V+Inf:stryke    # ;
              +V+Imp:stryk     # ;
          +V+Ind+Prs:stryker   # ;
     +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:strykes   # ;
          +V+Ind+Prt:strøyk    # ;
   +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:strøk     # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Err/Orth:strauk    # ;
           +V+PrfPrc:strøket   # ;
           +V+PrsPrc:strykende # ;
LEXICON STÅ !!≈ * **@CODE@**
            +V+Inf:stå     # ;
            +V+Imp:stå     # ;
        +V+Ind+Prs:står    # ;
   +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:stås    # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:stod    # ;
        +V+Ind+Prt:sto     # ;
         +V+PrfPrc:stått   # ;
         +V+PrsPrc:stående # ;
LEXICON STØKKE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:støkke    # ;
          +V+Imp:støkk     # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:støkker   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:støkkes   # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:støkk     # ;
       +V+PrfPrc:støkket   # ;
       +V+PrsPrc:støkkende # ;
LEXICON SVELTE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
            +V+Inf:svelte    # ;
            +V+Imp:svelt     # ;
        +V+Ind+Prs:svelter   # ;
   +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:sveltes   # ;
        +V+Ind+Prt:svalt     # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:svelta    # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:sveltet   # ;
         +V+PrfPrc:sveltet   # ;
  +V+PrfPrc+Use/NG:svelta    # ;
         +V+PrsPrc:sveltende # ;
LEXICON SVERGE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
           +V+Inf:sverge    # ;
           +V+Imp:sverg     # ;
       +V+Ind+Prs:sverger   # ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:sverges   # ;
       +V+Ind+Prt:sverga    # ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:sverget   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:svor      # ;
        +V+PrfPrc:sverga    # ;
 +V+PrfPrc+Use/NG:sverget   # ;
 +V+PrfPrc+Use/NG:svoret   # ;
        +V+PrsPrc:svergende # ;
LEXICON SVI !!≈ * **@CODE@**
            +V+Inf:svi     # ;
            +V+Imp:svi     # ;
        +V+Ind+Prs:svir    # ;
   +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:svis    # ;
        +V+Ind+Prt:svei    # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:sved    # ;        
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:svidde  # ;
         +V+PrfPrc:svidd   # ;
         +V+PrsPrc:sviende # ;
LEXICON SVIKE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
            +V+Inf:svike    # ;
            +V+Imp:svik     # ;
        +V+Ind+Prs:sviker   # ;
   +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:svikes   # ;
        +V+Ind+Prt:sveik    # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:svek     # ;
         +V+PrfPrc:sveket   # ;
         +V+PrsPrc:svikende # ;
LEXICON SVINGE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
            +V+Inf:svinge    # ;
            +V+Imp:sving     # ;
        +V+Ind+Prs:svinger   # ;
   +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:svinges   # ;
        +V+Ind+Prt:svingte   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:svang     # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:svinget   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:svinga    # ;
         +V+PrfPrc:svingt    # ;
  +V+PrfPrc+Use/NG:svunget   # ;
  +V+PrfPrc+Use/NG:svinget   # ;
  +V+PrfPrc+Use/NG:svinga    # ;
         +V+PrsPrc:svingende # ;
LEXICON SVINNE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:svinne    # ;
          +V+Imp:svinn     # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:svinner   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:svinnes   # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:svant     # ;
       +V+PrfPrc:svunnet   # ;
       +V+PrsPrc:svinnende # ;
LEXICON SVIVE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
           +V+Inf:svive    # ;
           +V+Imp:sviv     # ;
       +V+Ind+Prs:sviver   # ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:svives   # ;
       +V+Ind+Prt:sveiv    # ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:svev     # ;       
+V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:svivet   # ;
        +V+PrfPrc:svivd    # ;
 +V+PrfPrc+Use/NG:svivet   # ;
        +V+PrsPrc:svivende # ;
LEXICON SYNGE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:synge    # ;
          +V+Imp:syng     # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:synger   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:synges   # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:sang     # ;
       +V+PrfPrc:sunget   # ;
       +V+PrsPrc:syngende # ;
LEXICON SYNKE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:synke    # ;
          +V+Imp:synk     # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:synker   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:synkes   # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:sank     # ;
       +V+PrfPrc:sunket   # ;
       +V+PrsPrc:synkende # ;
LEXICON SØKKE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:søkke    # ;
          +V+Imp:søkk     # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:søkker   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:søkkes   # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:søkk     # ;
       +V+PrfPrc:søkket   # ;
       +V+PrsPrc:søkkende # ;
LEXICON TA !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:ta     # ;
          +V+Imp:ta     # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:tar    # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:tas    # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:tok    # ;
       +V+PrfPrc:tatt   # ;
       +V+PrsPrc:taende # ;
LEXICON TELLE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
           +V+Inf:telle    # ;
           +V+Imp:tell     # ;
       +V+Ind+Prs:teller   # ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:telles   # ;
       +V+Ind+Prt:telte    # ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:talte    # ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:tellet   # ;
        +V+PrfPrc:telt     # ;
 +V+PrfPrc+Use/NG:talt     # ;
 +V+PrfPrc+Use/NG:tellet   # ;
        +V+PrsPrc:tellende # ;
!LEXICON TIE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
!          +V+Inf:tie    # ;
!          +V+Imp:ti     # ;
!      +V+Ind+Prs:tier   # ;
! +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:ties   # ;
!      +V+Ind+Prt:tidde  # ;
!       +V+PrfPrc:tidd   # ;
!       +V+PrsPrc:tiende # ;
LEXICON TRE_V !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:tre     # ;
          +V+Imp:tre     # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:trer    # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:tres    # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:tredde  # ;
       +V+PrfPrc:tredd   # ;
       +V+PrsPrc:treende # ;
LEXICON TORE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
            +V+Inf:tore  # ;
            +V+Imp:tør   # ;
        +V+Ind+Prs:tør   # ;
        +V+Ind+Prt:turte # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:torde # ;
         +V+PrfPrc:turt  # ;
  +V+PrfPrc+Use/NG:tort  # ;
LEXICON TREFFE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:treffe    # ;
          +V+Imp:treff     # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:treffer   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:treffes   # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:traff     # ;
       +V+PrfPrc:truffet   # ;
       +V+PrsPrc:treffende # ;
LEXICON TREKKE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:trekke    # ;
          +V+Imp:trekk     # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:trekker   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:trekkes   # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:trakk     # ;
       +V+PrfPrc:trukket   # ;
       +V+PrsPrc:trekkende # ;
