src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot
anstå:an STÅ ;
anta:an TA ;
anstå:an STÅ ;
avstå:av STÅ ;
avta:av TA ;
bestige:be STIGE ;
bestikke:be STIKKE ;
bestjele:be STJELE ;
bestride:be STRIDE ;
bestå:be STÅ ;
besynge:be SYNGE ;
beta:be TA ;
bistå:bi STÅ ;
brunsvi:brun SVI ;
delta:del TA ;
etterspørre:etter SPØRRE ;
forespørre:fore SPØRRE ;
forestå:fore STÅ ;
foreta:fore TA ;
foretrekke:fore TREKKE ;
forstå:for STÅ ;
forsvinne:for SVINNE ;
fortelle:for TELLE ;
fortrekke:for TREKKE ;
framstå:fram STÅ ;
framtre:fram TRE_V ;
frastjele:fra STJELE ;
frata:fra TA ;
fratre:fra TRE_V ;
fremstå:frem STÅ ;
fremtre:frem TRE_V ;
frita:fri TA ;
gjenfortelle:gjenfor TELLE ;
gjenoppta:gjenopp TA ;
gjenstå:gjen STÅ ;
gjenta:gjen TA ;
godta:god TA ;
hensynke:hen SYNKE ;
iaktta:iakt TA ;
innestå:inne STÅ ;
innta:inn TA ;
inntre:inn TRE_V ;
ivareta:ivare TA ;
kakstryke:kak STRYKE ;
mista:mis TA ;
motstå:mot STÅ ;
motta:mot TA ;
oppstå:opp STÅ ;
oppta:opp TA ;
opptre:opp TRE_V ;
overstige:over STIGE ;
overstryke:over STRYKE ;
overta:over TA ;
overtre:over TRE_V ; 
overtrekke:over TREKKE ;
påstå:på STÅ ;
påta:på TA ;
rådspørre:råd SPØRRE ;
småsynge:små SYNGE ;
spørre: SPØRRE ;
stele: STELE ;
stige: STIGE ;
stikke: STIKKE ;
stjele: STJELE ;
strekke: STREKKE ;
stride: STRIDE ;
stryke: STRYKE ;
stå: STÅ ;
støkke: STØKKE ;
svelte: SVELTE ; ! Egt to verb, det andre er svelte v1. Problematisk å ha med begge utan vidare?
sverge: SVERGE ;
svi: SVI ;
svike: SVIKE ;
svinge: SVINGE ;
svinne: SVINNE ;
svive: SVIVE ;
synge: SYNGE ;
synke: SYNKE ;
søkke: SØKKE ;
ta: TA ;
telle: TELLE ;
tilstå:til STÅ ;
tiltre:til TRE_V ;
tiltrekke:til TREKKE ;
tore: TORE ;
tre: TRE_V ;
treffe: TREFFE ;
trekke: TREKKE ;
unnta:unn TA ;
utspørre:ut SPØRRE ;
utstå:ut STÅ ;
utta:ut TA ;
vareta:vare TA ;
vedstå:ved STÅ ;
vedta:ved TA ;
voldta:vold TA ;
